District of Columbia statutes.
11-1725

Appointment of nonjudicial personnel.

(a)

Subject to the approval of the Joint Committee, the Executive Officer shall appoint, and may remove, the Fiscal Officer, and such other personnel whose principal function is to perform duties for both District of Columbia courts.

(b)

The Executive Officer shall appoint, and may remove, the Director of Social Services, the clerks of the courts, the Auditor-Master, and all other nonjudicial personnel for the courts (other than the Register of Wills and personal law clerks and secretaries of the judges) as may be necessary, subject to —

(1)

regulations approved by the Joint Committee; and

(2)

the approval of the chief judge of the court to which the personnel are or will be assigned.

Appointments and removals of court personnel shall not be subject to the laws, rules, and limitations applicable to District of Columbia employees.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 511, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 752, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11242(c)

History

1981 Ed., § 11-1725.
1973 Ed., § 11-1725.

Prior Codifications